Illinois, session 104th, SB3649.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-54 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-54 new)7    Sec. 5-54. Electronic visit verification system; live-in 8caregiver exemption. In accordance with federal guidance 9issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 10Services in its "CMCS Informational Bulletin" on August 8, 112019 that allows state Medicaid agencies to exempt live-in 12caregivers from the electronic visit verification requirements 13authorized under Section 12006(a) of the 21st Century Cures 14Act (Public Law 114-255), the Department of Healthcare and 15Family Services shall exempt from electronic visit 16verification requirements all live-in caregivers who provide 17personal care services under the Adults with Developmental 18Disabilities waiver and the Support Waiver for Children and 19Young Adults with Developmental Disabilities authorized under 20Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act. As used in this 21Section, "live-in caregiver" means a caregiver as defined by 22the Department of Human Services. The Department of Healthcare 23and Family Services and the Department of Human Services may   SB3649- 2 -LRB104 19303 KTG 32749 b1adopt any rules necessary to implement this Section, including 2rules on the form and manner in which a live-in caregiver must 3verify that he or she meets the definition of "live-in 4caregiver". 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.